Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 5 VEHICLE TITLES
§ 49-523A. Title stop when ownership of vehicle disputed.

Whenever a party claims an interest in a vehicle subject to a title, the party may request a title stop be placed upon the title record of the vehicle.

The request for title stop shall be provided to the department, together with documentation supporting the request and the fee required pursuant to the provisions of section 49-202(2)(i), Idaho Code.

A verbal request to the department for a title stop may be placed on the title record for up to five (5) business days upon advising the requestor of the requirements and giving the requestor time to send the written request. Failure to send the written request shall terminate the request at the end of the five (5) business days.

Upon receipt of the request for title stop, the department may place a stop on the title record of the subject vehicle if it appears from the documentation provided that there exists a reasonable dispute as to the ownership of the vehicle.

Notwithstanding the placement of a stop or the filing of a stop request, the department shall process an application for title accompanied by a properly completed affidavit of repossession, or to record a lien or encumbrance, unless the requestor of the stop has provided the department with a court order restraining the issuance of title. In all other applications for title, the department shall place or maintain a stop and shall notify the title applicant that a stop is in place.

Once the title stop is placed by the department, the requesting party shall provide evidence of a judicial filing relating to the subject vehicle within thirty (30) days of the title stop becoming effective. Failure to provide such evidence shall result in the department’s cancellation of the title stop.

Upon receipt of a written request for a title stop and the required fee, the department shall send notice of the title stop to the titled owners and any other party with recorded interest or lienholder recorded on the title records of the department.

Upon receipt by the department of satisfactory evidence of a judicial filing, the title stop shall remain in place until a final order of the judicial proceeding is received, the requesting party has instructed the department to remove the stop, the requesting party has failed to respond to notice under paragraph (c) of this subsection or for one (1) year, unless renewed by the requestor, whichever comes first.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if a person files evidence with the department that the person has acquired title to the vehicle for which a title stop has been placed, then the department shall send notice to the original requesting party providing ten (10) business days from the date notice was mailed to object to the release of the title stop. If the department does not receive timely response from the requesting party or if the requesting party instructs the department to remove the stop, then the title stop shall be immediately released.

During the pendency of the title stop, no title applications for the vehicle to which the stop pertains shall be processed by the department except as otherwise provided in this section.

Title stops requested by a governmental agency shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (6) of this section. Such title stop shall be valid for two (2) years, unless renewed by the governmental agency requesting the stop. Governmental agencies shall be exempt from the fee required in section 49-202(2)(i), Idaho Code.
(9) The provisions of this section shall be effective for any title stop received on and after July 1, 2015.

§ 49-524. Salvage certificate of title or electronic file to replace certificate of title or certificate of origin on vehicles.

Every person acquiring a vehicle that has been determined to be a salvage vehicle shall obtain a salvage certificate of title on that vehicle.

The salvage certificate of title shall replace the manufacturer’s certificate of origin, manufacturer’s statement of origin, certificate of title or other comparable ownership document and shall indicate ownership only; it shall not be valid for registration purposes.

A salvage certificate of title shall be issued by the department or under the direction of the department and shall be on a form or electronic file as prescribed by the department. The form shall provide for assignments of the salvage certificate of title.

The fee for a salvage certificate of title or electronic filing of a salvage certificate of title shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 49-202(2)(b), Idaho Code. The fee shall be deposited in the state highway account.

Every insurer making payment for a vehicle that has been determined to be a salvage vehicle shall, within thirty (30) days from receipt of the properly released manufacturer’s certificate of origin, manufacturer’s statement of origin, certificate of title or other comparable ownership document, surrender such document to the department, along with an application for salvage certificate of title, the salvage certificate of title fee and other documents as required by the department for processing. The department shall issue a salvage certificate of title to the applicant if all requirements have been satisfied.

If a salvage pool receives a manufacturer’s certificate of origin, manufacturer’s statement of origin, certificate of title or other comparable ownership document for a vehicle that has been determined to be a salvage vehicle, the salvage pool shall, within thirty (30) days and upon receipt of the properly released ownership document, surrender such document to the department, along with an application for salvage certificate of title, the salvage certificate of title fee and other documents as required by the department for processing. The department shall issue a salvage certificate of title to the applicant if all requirements have been satisfied.

If an insurer has made payment for a salvage vehicle and the insurer or a salvage pool is unable to obtain a properly released manufacturer’s certificate of origin, manufacturer’s statement of origin, certificate of title or other comparable ownership document for the salvage vehicle within thirty (30) days after the acceptance by the owner of an amount in settlement of a total loss, then the insurer or salvage pool may submit an application for salvage certificate of title to the department without having first obtained one (1) of the aforementioned ownership documents. In place of one (1) of the aforementioned ownership documents, the insurer or the salvage pool shall submit to the department the following: a sworn statement that it made at least two (2) written attempts to obtain from the owner the properly released manufacturer’s certificate of origin, manufacturer’s statement of origin, certificate of title or other comparable ownership document by sending notice to the owner at the owner’s address of record with the department, together with a copy of each such written attempt. Additionally, the insurer or salvage pool shall include proper evidence of the satisfaction or discharge of any lien or encumbrance properly noted upon the certificate of title or upon the electronic records of the department, an application for salvage certificate of title, the salvage certificate of title fee, indemnifying affidavit and other documents as required by the department for processing. The department shall issue a salvage certificate of title if all requirements have been satisfied.
(8) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by up to six (6) months in jail, a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or both, if the owner of a retained salvage vehicle fails to surrender the title and be issued a salvage certificate of title, or to sell the vehicle and not tell the buyer that the vehicle is totaled.

(9) If an insurer has allowed the owner to retain ownership of the salvage vehicle, the owner must surrender the certificate of title for such vehicle to the department not later than thirty (30) days from the date that the claim was satisfied. The insurer must notify the department of a total loss payoff within thirty (30) days. The department shall issue a salvage certificate of title to the owner prior to any sale or disposition of the salvage vehicle.

(10) If an insurer acquires the manufacturer’s certificate of origin, manufacturer’s statement of origin, certificate of title or other comparable ownership document for a vehicle in a settlement of a theft claim, the insurer shall immediately, upon receipt of the properly released ownership document, surrender such document to the department, along with an application for salvage certificate of title in the name of the insurer, the salvage certificate of title fee and other documents as required by the department for processing.

(11) If an insurer has acquired a vehicle in a settlement of a theft claim, has made application to and has been issued a new salvage certificate of title in the name of the insurer and the vehicle is subsequently recovered and is not damaged to the extent that it is a salvage vehicle, the insurer may complete an affidavit indemnifying the department stating the facts of acquisition and disposition of the vehicle in a form prescribed by the department and deliver the salvage certificate of title of ownership, affidavit and any other documents required by the department to the transferee at the time of delivery of the vehicle. When these documents are submitted with an application for title, the subsequent title for the vehicle will not be issued with the brand “rebuilt salvage” based on the theft incident, but a notation of “theft recovery” shall be made on the title certificate and title record.

(12) Any person acquiring ownership of a salvage vehicle purchased in a state or jurisdiction that does not require surrender of the certificate of title or comparable ownership document shall, within thirty (30) days following delivery of the certificate of title or ownership document, surrender such title or document to the department and apply for a salvage certificate of title.

(13) An owner of a salvage vehicle who sells or transfers said vehicle shall provide a properly executed assignment of the salvage certificate of ownership to the transferee.

(14) A purchaser of a salvage vehicle shall not possess or retain a salvage vehicle without a salvage certificate of title. The salvage vehicle purchaser shall display the salvage certificate of title upon the request of any peace officer or agent of the department.

§ 49-525. Salvage-certified vehicle — Branded certificate of title.

The department shall issue a branded certificate of title on any vehicle for which a salvage certificate of title, salvage bill of sale or other documentation showing evidence that the vehicle has been declared salvage has been issued by this or any other state, provided, if documentation of salvage certification has been received from another state, the requirements specified in section 49-524, Idaho Code, shall be applied to that vehicle.

If an otherwise correct application is made for a certificate of title on any salvage vehicle, the department shall issue a branded certificate of title as a “rebuilt salvage vehicle” if the application for a certificate of title is supported by a salvage vehicle statement completed by the owner which states:

That the owner personally rebuilt or repaired the vehicle or personally supervised its rebuilding or repairing and includes a description of work done to restore the vehicle to the operating condition that existed prior to the event which caused the salvage certificate of title to be issued;

That the identification numbers of the restored vehicle and its parts have not, to the knowledge of the owner, been removed, destroyed, falsified, altered or defaced;

That the salvage certificate of title document or out-of-state title certificate attached to the application has not to the knowledge of the owner been forged, falsified or altered; and

That all information contained on the application and its attachments is true and correct.

Each branded certificate of title or other ownership document received from another jurisdiction or authorized ownership document-issuing entity shall have its brand carried forward to all subsequent certificates of title issued in this state.

Every brand retrieved from the national motor vehicle title information system shall be carried forward to all subsequent titles issued by this state.

The department may promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of sections 49-524 and 49-525, Idaho Code.

§ 49-526. Release of liability upon sale of vehicle.

The department shall require that a separate release of liability statement be completed by the owner of a motor vehicle upon sale or transfer of the motor vehicle to another party. The statement shall be forwarded to the department by the former owner, together with the proper fee as provided in section 49-202, Idaho Code, within five (5) days of delivery of the motor vehicle to a dealer, purchaser or other transferee. The statement shall include the motor vehicle identification number, vehicle description, name of seller, name and address of buyer or other transferee, date of sale, odometer reading, and sales price. Provided that:

A lienholder may complete the release of liability on behalf of the registered owner when the title is released by the lienholder directly to a dealer or new purchaser.

Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 16, title 49, Idaho Code, are not required to report dealer-to-dealer transfers to the department. However, dealers are required to maintain a record of the transfer for audit and tracking purposes.

Any former owner who files a release of liability statement with the department pursuant to this section shall not be liable under section 49-2417, Idaho Code, nor shall the former owner be liable for any motor vehicle infractions, towing, storage, repair or service charges that may occur subsequent to delivery of the vehicle to a dealer, purchaser or other transferee.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly file or attempt to file a release of liability statement which contains false information.

§ 49-527. Purpose of transitional ownership document.

The purpose of a transitional ownership document is to enable security interest to be perfected in a timely manner when the primary ownership document is not available. The transitional ownership document serves to perfect a lien against creditors or subsequent purchasers.

To perfect a security interest the transitional ownership document must be received by the department or agent within thirty (30) days of the date of sale. To determine the thirty (30) days, exclude the first day (i.e., date of sale) and count each calendar day thereafter. If the thirtieth day falls on a weekend or holiday it is not counted; the last date the transitional ownership document will be accepted is the following business day of the department or agent.

The lien will be perfected as of the date and time of filing consistent with section 49-510, Idaho Code.

The transitional ownership document is not intended to supersede the requirements of section 49-504, Idaho Code, but rather to provide an alternative method of lien perfection.

Once a transitional ownership document has been filed with the department or agent, the primary ownership document must be received by the department or agent within ninety (90) calendar days from the date of the security agreement or contract. To determine ninety (90) days, exclude the first day (i.e., day of sale) and count each calendar day thereafter. If the ninetieth day falls on a weekend or holiday, the last date the transitional ownership document may be used to determine date of security interest perfection is the following business day of the department or agent.

§ 49-528. Circumstances under which transitional ownership document acceptable as evidence of ownership.

A transitional ownership document is acceptable as evidence of ownership only if the primary ownership document:

Is not in the possession of the selling dealer, new security interest holder or the agent of either at the time the transitional ownership document is submitted to the department; and

To the best of the knowledge of the selling dealer, security interest holder or agent, will not be available for submission to the department within thirty (30) days of the date of sale or if no sale is involved, within the date of a security agreement or contract.

§ 49-529. Mandatory rejection or invalidation of transitional ownership document by department.

The transportation department shall reject, return or subsequently invalidate a transitional ownership document if:

More than thirty (30) days have elapsed between the date of sale, or if no sale is involved, more than thirty (30) days have elapsed between the date the contract or security interest being perfected was signed and the date the transitional ownership document is received by the department;

The transitional ownership document does not contain all of the information contained in section 49-121(7), Idaho Code;

It is determined that persons named on the transitional ownership document as having a security interest did not have a security interest on the date the transitional ownership document was received;

It is determined the person who submitted the transitional ownership document made false statements in completing the transitional ownership document;

The department does not receive the primary ownership document from the date of sale within ninety (90) days of the date of sale or if no sale is involved, within ninety (90) days from the date the security agreement or contract was signed;

The security interest holder or person submitting the transitional ownership document elects to retain, requests it be returned or requests that the transitional ownership document be withdrawn; or

The information on or in the transitional ownership document has been changed or altered in a manner that is not acceptable to the department.

§ 49-530. Discretionary rejection or invalidation of document by department.

The transportation department may reject, return or subsequently invalidate a transitional ownership document if it is determined that:

Title is to be issued to someone other than the person shown on the transitional ownership document;

Interests reflected on the primary ownership document or in information submitted in conjunction with that document conflict with the interests as reflected on the transitional ownership document;

The person submitting the transitional ownership document has failed to submit the nonrefundable fee required by section 49-202(e), Idaho Code; or

A copy of the application for certificate of title is not attached as required by the department.

§ 49-531 — 49-578. [Repealed.]

§ 49-579. Violation an infraction

Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 49-580. [Reserved.]

§ 49-581 — 49-591. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-592. Abandoned vehicles. [Repealed.]

§ 49-592A. Authorizing seizure of motor and other vehicles — Prohibiting defacing, altering or obliterating numbers — Sales prohibited

Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 49-593 — 49-595. [Amended and Redesignated.]